Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1531
Reduction in force; board and administration; duties.

Before a reduction in force occurs, the board and administration shall present competent evidence demonstrating that a change in circumstances has occurred, necessitating a reduction in force. Any alleged change in circumstances shall be specifically related to the teacher or teachers to be reduced in force, and the board, based upon evidence produced at the hearing required by section 85-1528 shall be required to specifically find that there are no other vacancies on the staff for which the employee to be reduced is qualified by endorsement or professional training to perform.

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 53.